Maine, session 132, LD1415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §1015-A, sub-§5, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 534, §4, is
amended to read:
A. The solicitation, acceptance, offer or gift of money or anything of value for bona
fide social events hosted for nonpartisan, charitable purposes, including those subject
to the reporting requirements in section 1016-H and Title 3, section 317, subsection
1-B.
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §1016-H is enacted to read:
§1016-H. Behested payments
When a person makes a behested payment of $200 or more on behalf of a Legislator,
the Legislator on whose behalf the payment was made shall file a statement with the
commission no later than 45 days after the date the payment was made. The statement
must disclose the name of the person who made the payment, the amount of the payment,
the name of the organization to which the payment was made and the primary purpose of
the organization. A behested payment does not include a contribution as defined in Title
21-A, section 1012, subsection 2. For the purposes of this section, "behested payment"
means a payment made to an organization for a legislative, governmental or charitable
purpose at the suggestion or solicitation of, or made in coordination with, a member of the
Legislature.
Sec. 3. 3 MRSA §317, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Behested payments. A lobbyist or lobbyist associate who makes a behested
payment on behalf of a Legislator shall notify the Legislator no less than 5 days after the
payment was made that the payment will be reported pursuant to this subsection. A lobbyist
or lobbyist associate who makes a behested payment on behalf of a Legislator shall file a
report pursuant to this subsection. A behested payment does not include a contribution as
defined in Title 21-A, section 1012, subsection 2. For the purpose of this subsection,
"behested payment" means a payment made to an organization for a legislative,
governmental or charitable purpose at the suggestion or solicitation of, or made in
coordination with, a member of the Legislature.
A. A report under this subsection is required for:
(1) Behested payments made by the lobbyist or lobbyist associate to any one
organization in a calendar year totaling $200 or more; and
(2) Behested payments made by the lobbyist or lobbyist associate to one or more
organizations in a calendar year totaling $400 or more.
B. The report must include:
(1) The date of the payment or payments;
(2) The name and address of the lobbyist, lobbyist associate or lobbying firm;
(3) The name of the Legislator on whose behalf the payment was made; and
(4) The name of the organization to which the payment was made and the primary
purpose of the organization.
Page 1 - 132LR1770(01)

C. A report under this subsection is due no later than 11:59 p.m. on the 15th calendar
day of the month following the month in which the behested payment was made.